Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.570

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Issuance of order.

Upon receipt of a petition or motion seeking a mandatory benefits assignment order that complies with RCW 41.50.560, the court shall issue a mandatory benefits assignment order as provided in RCW 41.50.590, including the information required in RCW 41.50.580 (1)(a) or (2)(a), directed to the department of retirement systems, and commanding the department to answer the order on the forms served with the order that comply with RCW 41.50.610 within twenty days after service of the order upon the department.

[ 1987 c 326 s 8.]